District of Columbia statutes.
44-951.02

Establishment of the Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation.

(a)

There is established as an instrumentality of the District government the Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation, which shall have a separate legal existence within the District government.

(b)

The primary purpose of the Corporation shall be to:

(1)

Receive the land, improvements on the land, equipment, and other assets of the United Medical Center;

(2)

Operate and take all actions to ensure the continued operation of the hospital; and

(3)

Sell or otherwise transfer all or part of the hospital and site, if a qualified buyer is identified.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5113, 58 DCR 6226
This section is referenced in § 44-951.01.